nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Tilbehør til slipemaskiner: Hjul og punkter til vinkelslipere
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Brúsne príslušenstvo: Brúsne kotúče a hroty
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Accesorii pentru mașina de rectificat: Discuri și vârfuri de șlefuit
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Schleifmaschinenzubehör: Schleifscheiben & -stifte
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Tilbehør til slibemaskine: Slibeskiver og -spidser
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Accessoires voor slijpmachines: Slijpschijven en -stiften
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Pribor za brusilice: Brusni kotači i vrhovi
es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Accesorios para rectificadoras: Muelas y puntas de rectificado
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Grinder Accessories: Grinding Wheels & Points
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Аксесоари за шлайф машина: Дискове и накрайници за шлайфане
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Příslušenství k bruskám: Brusné kotouče a hroty
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 研磨机配件: 磨轮/研磨点
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Acessórios para rebarbadoras: Discos e rebolos para esmeril
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Αξεσουάρ τροχών: Τροχοί & αιχμές λείανσης
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Аксессуары для шлифовальных машин: Шлифовальные диски и насадки
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Köszörűkiegészítők: Köszörűkorongok és -pontok
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 研磨機配件: 砂輪/錐形磨頭
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > グラインダー関連用品: グラインダー用ホイール・ポイント
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Accessori per smerigliatrici: Dischi e punte per smerigliatrici
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Taşlama Makinesi Aksesuarları: Taşlama Makinesi Taşları ve Uçları
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Tillbehör till slipmaskin: Sliphjul och slippunkter
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Accessoires pour meuleuses: Meules et pointes montées
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Hiomakoneen lisätarvikkeet: Hiomakiekot ja hiomapäät
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Phụ kiện máy mài: Bánh và mũi mài
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 연삭기 부대용품: 연삭 숫돌/포인트
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Acessórios de lixadora/esmeril: Pontas e discos de lixadora/esmeril
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องบด: หินเจียและหินเจียแกน
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Dodatki za brusilnike: Brusilna kolesa in konice
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Šlifuoklių priedai: Šlifavimo diskai ir antgaliai
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Akcesoria do szlifierek: Kamienie i tarcze szlifierskie